New York, session 2025-2026, S10159.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of the state finance law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 14 to read as follows: 3 14. Any grant or appropriation of money to a municipality or locality 4 by the state for the procurement of goods and services shall require 5 such municipality be in compliance with the goals for minority and 6 women-owned business enterprise participation pursuant to sections three 7 hundred twelve and three hundred thirteen of the executive law. Munici- 8 pality, for purposes of this subdivision, shall mean any village, town, 9 city, county, or school district within the state. Such requirement 10 shall also apply to any entity who subcontracts with a municipality or 11 locality. Nothing in this section shall supersede an applicant's or 12 recipient's ability to use a waiver as prescribed by such sections. 13 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10964-01-5